Illinois, session 104th, SB3939.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Deposit of State Moneys Act is amended by 5changing Sections 7 and 22.5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 520/7)  (from Ch. 130, par. 26)7    Sec. 7. (a) State depositories. The State Treasurer may, 8in his or her discretion, allow a financial institution to 9become a State depository. To become an approved State 10depository, a financial institution shall submit an 11application or proposal, along with all required forms and 12documentation, in a manner prescribed by the Treasurer.13    In order to receive funds under this Section, a financial 14institution must become a State depository. Prior to allowing 15a financial institution to become a State depository, the 16State Treasurer shall consider the financial institution's 17financial condition and community and economic development 18efforts. 19    All applications submitted pursuant to this Section will 20be reviewed in accordance with the terms defined by the 21program documents and in the respective application and 22related documents. 23    (b) Linked deposits. The State Treasurer may, in his or   SB3939- 2 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1her discretion, accept a proposal or application from a 2financial institution which provides for a reduced rate of 3interest provided that the financial institution uses the 4deposited funds for the purpose of economic and community 5development in the State of Illinois, which may include, but 6not be limited to loans for the following: agriculture, 7business, individuals, and community development. Financial 8institutions, and, in some cases borrowers, that utilize 9linked deposit funds shall provide documentation regarding the 10use of such funds in a manner prescribed by the Treasurer.11    (b-5) (Blank).12    (b-10) (Blank).13    (b-15) Access to capital. The State Treasurer may, in his 14or her discretion, accept a proposal or application from a 15financial institution for access to capital at market rate to 16provide added liquidity or administer lending activities in 17the State of Illinois. 18    (b-20) The State Treasurer may accept a proposal or 19application from a financial institution for access to capital 20at a market rate, determined by the Treasurer, that allows the 21Treasurer to provide funding to a county for relief of 22property tax payments. The State Treasurer Shall adopt rules 23that are necessary and proper to implement and administer this 24program. 25    (c) Home loans. The State Treasurer may, in his or her 26discretion, accept a proposal or application from a financial   SB3939- 3 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1institution that provides for interest earnings on deposits of 2State moneys to be held by the financial institution in a 3separate account that the State Treasurer may use to secure up 4to 10% of any (i) home loans to Illinois citizens purchasing or 5refinancing a home in Illinois in situations where the 6participating financial institution would not offer the 7borrower a home loan under the financial institution's 8prevailing credit standards without the incentive of the 10% 9guarantee for the first 5 years of the loan, (ii) existing home 10loans of Illinois citizens who have failed to make payments on 11a home loan as a result of a financial hardship due to 12circumstances beyond the control of the borrower where there 13is a reasonable prospect that the borrower will be able to 14resume full mortgage payments, and (iii) loans in amounts that 15do not exceed the amount of arrearage on a mortgage and that 16are extended to enable a borrower to become current on his or 17her mortgage obligation.18    The following factors shall be considered by the 19participating financial institution to determine whether the 20financial hardship is due to circumstances beyond the control 21of the borrower: (i) loss, reduction, or delay in the receipt 22of income because of the death or disability of a person who 23contributed to the household income, (ii) expenses actually 24incurred related to the uninsured damage or costly repairs to 25the mortgaged premises affecting its habitability, (iii) 26expenses related to the death or illness in the borrower's   SB3939- 4 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1household or of family members living outside the household 2that reduce the amount of household income, (iv) loss of 3income or a substantial increase in total housing expenses 4because of divorce, abandonment, separation from a spouse, or 5failure to support a spouse or child, (v) unemployment or 6underemployment, (vi) loss, reduction, or delay in the receipt 7of federal, State, or other government benefits, and (vii) 8participation by the homeowner in a recognized labor action 9such as a strike. In determining whether there is a reasonable 10prospect that the borrower will be able to resume full 11mortgage payments, the participating financial institution 12shall consider factors including, but not necessarily limited 13to the following: (i) a favorable work and credit history, 14(ii) the borrower's ability to and history of paying the 15mortgage when employed, (iii) the lack of an impediment or 16disability that prevents reemployment, (iv) new education and 17training opportunities, (v) non-cash benefits that may reduce 18household expenses, and (vi) other debts.19    For the purposes of this Section, "home loan" means a 20loan, other than an open-end credit plan or a reverse mortgage 21transaction, for which (i) the principal amount of the loan 22does not exceed the conforming loan size limit as established 23from time to time by the Federal National Mortgage 24Association, (ii) the borrower is a natural person, (iii) the 25debt is incurred by the borrower primarily for personal, 26family, or household purposes, and (iv) the loan is secured by   SB3939- 5 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1a mortgage or deed of trust on real estate upon which there is 2located or there is to be located a structure designed 3principally for the occupancy of no more than 4 families and 4that is or will be occupied by the borrower as the borrower's 5principal dwelling.6    (d) If there is an agreement between the State Treasurer 7and an eligible institution that details the use of deposited 8funds, the agreement may not require the gift of money, goods, 9or services to a third party; this provision does not restrict 10the eligible institution from contracting with third parties 11in order to carry out the intent of the agreement or restrict 12the State Treasurer from placing requirements upon third-party 13contracts entered into by the eligible institution.14(Source: P.A. 102-297, eff. 8-6-21.) 15    (15 ILCS 520/22.5)  (from Ch. 130, par. 41a)16    (For force and effect of certain provisions, see Section 1790 of P.A. 94-79)18    Sec. 22.5. Permitted investments. The State Treasurer may 19invest and reinvest any State money in the State Treasury 20which is not needed for current expenditures due or about to 21become due, in obligations of the United States government or 22its agencies or of National Mortgage Associations established 23by or under the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1701 et seq., 24or in mortgage participation certificates representing 25undivided interests in specified, first-lien conventional   SB3939- 6 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1residential Illinois mortgages that are underwritten, insured, 2guaranteed, or purchased by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage 3Corporation or in Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds 4or Notes as defined in and issued pursuant to the Illinois 5Housing Development Act. All such obligations shall be 6considered as cash and may be delivered over as cash by a State 7Treasurer to his successor.8    The State Treasurer may purchase any state bonds with any 9money in the State Treasury that has been set aside and held 10for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. 11The bonds shall be considered as cash and may be delivered over 12as cash by the State Treasurer to his successor.13    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest any State money 14in the State Treasury that is not needed for current 15expenditures due or about to become due, or any money in the 16State Treasury that has been set aside and held for the payment 17of the principal of and interest on any State bonds, in bonds 18issued by counties or municipal corporations of the State of 19Illinois.20    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest up to 5% of the 21College Savings Pool Administrative Trust Fund, the Illinois 22Public Treasurer Investment Pool (IPTIP) Administrative Trust 23Fund, and the State Treasurer's Administrative Fund that is 24not needed for current expenditures due or about to become 25due, in common or preferred stocks of publicly traded 26corporations, partnerships, or limited liability companies,   SB3939- 7 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1organized in the United States, with assets exceeding 2$500,000,000 if: (i) the purchases do not exceed 1% of the 3corporation's or the limited liability company's outstanding 4common and preferred stock; (ii) no more than 10% of the total 5funds are invested in any one publicly traded corporation, 6partnership, or limited liability company; and (iii) the 7corporation or the limited liability company has not been 8placed on the list of restricted companies by the Illinois 9Investment Policy Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois 10Pension Code. 11    Whenever the total amount of vouchers presented to the 12Comptroller under Section 9 of the State Comptroller Act 13exceeds the funds available in the General Revenue Fund by 14$500,000,000 or more, then the State Treasurer may invest any 15State money in the State Treasury, other than money in the 16General Revenue Fund, Health Insurance Reserve Fund, Attorney 17General Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment 18Projects Fund, Attorney General Whistleblower Reward and 19Protection Fund, and Attorney General's State Projects and 20Court Ordered Distribution Fund, which is not needed for 21current expenditures, due or about to become due, or any money 22in the State Treasury which has been set aside and held for the 23payment of the principal of and the interest on any State bonds 24with the Office of the Comptroller in order to enable the 25Comptroller to pay outstanding vouchers. At any time, and from 26time to time outstanding, such investment shall not be greater   SB3939- 8 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1than $2,000,000,000. Such investment shall be deposited into 2the General Revenue Fund or Health Insurance Reserve Fund as 3determined by the Comptroller. On or after July 1, 2025, and 4through June 30, 2026, at the request of the Governor and with 5the approval of the Treasurer, the Comptroller may make 6deposits into other funds in the State Treasury to pay 7outstanding vouchers or in anticipation of vouchers that may 8be submitted to the Comptroller for payment. Such investment 9shall be repaid by the Comptroller with an interest rate tied 10to the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (SOFR) or the Federal 11Funds Rate or an equivalent market established variable rate, 12but in no case shall such interest rate exceed the lesser of 13the penalty rate established under the State Prompt Payment 14Act or the timely pay interest rate under Section 368a of the 15Illinois Insurance Code. The State Treasurer and the 16Comptroller shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement to 17establish procedures for such investments, which market 18established variable rate to which the interest rate for the 19investments should be tied, and other terms which the State 20Treasurer and Comptroller reasonably believe to be mutually 21beneficial concerning these investments by the State 22Treasurer. The State Treasurer and Comptroller shall also 23enter into a written agreement for each such investment that 24specifies the period of the investment, the payment interval, 25the interest rate to be paid, the funds in the State Treasury 26from which the State Treasurer will draw the investment, and   SB3939- 9 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1other terms upon which the State Treasurer and Comptroller 2mutually agree. Such investment agreements shall be public 3records and the State Treasurer shall post the terms of all 4such investment agreements on the State Treasurer's official 5website. In compliance with the intergovernmental agreement, 6the Comptroller shall order and the State Treasurer shall 7transfer amounts sufficient for the payment of principal and 8interest invested by the State Treasurer with the Office of 9the Comptroller under this paragraph from the General Revenue 10Fund or the Health Insurance Reserve Fund or, from July 1, 2025 11through June 30, 2026, the fund identified by the Governor, to 12the respective funds in the State Treasury from which the 13State Treasurer drew the investment. Public Act 100-1107 shall 14constitute an irrevocable and continuing authority for all 15amounts necessary for the payment of principal and interest on 16the investments made with the Office of the Comptroller by the 17State Treasurer under this paragraph, and the irrevocable and 18continuing authority for and direction to the Comptroller and 19State Treasurer to make the necessary transfers. 20    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest any State money 21in the State Treasury that is not needed for current 22expenditure, due or about to become due, or any money in the 23State Treasury that has been set aside and held for the payment 24of the principal of and the interest on any State bonds, or any 25proceeds from a Tax Sale Surplus Relief Program, in any of the 26following:  SB3939- 10 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        (1) Bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, 2    Treasury bills, or other securities now or hereafter 3    issued that are guaranteed by the full faith and credit of 4    the United States of America as to principal and interest.5        (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 6    obligations of the United States of America, its agencies, 7    and instrumentalities, or other obligations that are 8    issued or guaranteed by supranational entities; provided, 9    that at the time of investment, the entity has the United 10    States government as a shareholder.11        (2.5) Bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 12    obligations of a foreign government, other than the 13    Republic of the Sudan, that are guaranteed by the full 14    faith and credit of that government as to principal and 15    interest, but only if the foreign government has not 16    defaulted and has met its payment obligations in a timely 17    manner on all similar obligations for a period of at least 18    25 years immediately before the time of acquiring those 19    obligations.20        (3) Interest-bearing savings accounts, 21    interest-bearing certificates of deposit, 22    interest-bearing time deposits, or any other investments 23    constituting direct obligations of any bank as defined by 24    the Illinois Banking Act.25        (4) Interest-bearing accounts, certificates of 26    deposit, or any other investments constituting direct   SB3939- 11 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    obligations of any savings and loan associations 2    incorporated under the laws of this State or any other 3    state or under the laws of the United States.4        (5) Dividend-bearing share accounts, share certificate 5    accounts, or class of share accounts of a credit union 6    chartered under the laws of this State or the laws of the 7    United States; provided, however, the principal office of 8    the credit union must be located within the State of 9    Illinois.10        (6) Bankers' acceptances of banks whose senior 11    obligations are rated in the top 2 rating categories by 2 12    national rating agencies and maintain that rating during 13    the term of the investment and the bank has not been placed 14    on the list of restricted companies by the Illinois 15    Investment Policy Board under Section 1-110.16 of the 16    Illinois Pension Code.17        (7) Short-term obligations of either corporations or 18    limited liability companies organized in the United States 19    with assets exceeding $500,000,000 if (i) the obligations 20    are rated at the time of purchase at one of the 3 highest 21    classifications established by at least 2 standard rating 22    services and mature not later than 270 days from the date 23    of purchase, (ii) the purchases do not exceed 10% of the 24    corporation's or the limited liability company's 25    outstanding obligations, (iii) no more than one-third of 26    the public agency's funds are invested in short-term   SB3939- 12 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    obligations of either corporations or limited liability 2    companies, and (iv) the corporation or the limited 3    liability company has not been placed on the list of 4    restricted companies by the Illinois Investment Policy 5    Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code.6        (7.5) Obligations of either corporations or limited 7    liability companies organized in the United States, that 8    have a significant presence in this State, with assets 9    exceeding $500,000,000 if: (i) the obligations are rated 10    at the time of purchase at one of the 3 highest 11    classifications established by at least 2 standard rating 12    services and mature more than 270 days, but less than 10 13    years, from the date of purchase; (ii) the purchases do 14    not exceed 10% of the corporation's or the limited 15    liability company's outstanding obligations; (iii) no more 16    than one-third of the public agency's funds are invested 17    in such obligations of corporations or limited liability 18    companies; and (iv) the corporation or the limited 19    liability company has not been placed on the list of 20    restricted companies by the Illinois Investment Policy 21    Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code. 22        (8) Money market mutual funds registered under the 23    Investment Company Act of 1940.24        (9) The Public Treasurers' Investment Pool created 25    under Section 17 of the State Treasurer Act or in a fund 26    managed, operated, and administered by a bank.  SB3939- 13 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        (10) Repurchase agreements of government securities 2    having the meaning set out in the Government Securities 3    Act of 1986, as now or hereafter amended or succeeded, 4    subject to the provisions of that Act and the regulations 5    issued thereunder.6        (11) Investments made in accordance with the 7    Technology Development Act.8        (12) Investments made in accordance with the Student 9    Investment Account Act.10        (13) Investments constituting direct obligations of a 11    community development financial institution, which is 12    certified by the United States Treasury Community 13    Development Financial Institutions Fund and is operating 14    in the State of Illinois.15        (14) Investments constituting direct obligations of a 16    minority depository institution, as designated by the 17    Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, that is operating 18    in the State of Illinois. 19        (15) Investments made in accordance with any other law 20    that authorizes the State Treasurer to invest or deposit 21    funds. 22    For purposes of this Section, "agencies" of the United 23States Government includes:24        (i) the federal land banks, federal intermediate 25    credit banks, banks for cooperatives, federal farm credit 26    banks, or any other entity authorized to issue debt   SB3939- 14 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    obligations under the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (12 U.S.C. 2    2001 et seq.) and Acts amendatory thereto;3        (ii) the federal home loan banks and the federal home 4    loan mortgage corporation;5        (iii) the Commodity Credit Corporation; and6        (iv) any other agency created by Act of Congress.7    The State Treasurer may lend any securities acquired under 8this Act. However, securities may be lent under this Section 9only in accordance with Federal Financial Institution 10Examination Council guidelines and only if the securities are 11collateralized at a level sufficient to assure the safety of 12the securities, taking into account market value fluctuation. 13The securities may be collateralized by cash or collateral 14acceptable under Sections 11 and 11.1.15(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 16    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 17Sections 21-75, 21-90, 21-135, 21-200, 21-210, 21-215, 21-220, 1821-225, 21-240, 21-245, and 21-251 and by adding Sections 1921-92, 21-342, and 21-398 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 200/21-75)21    Sec. 21-75. Lien for taxes. The taxes upon property, 22together with all penalties, interests and costs that may 23accrue thereon, shall be a prior and first lien on the 24property, superior to all other liens and encumbrances, from   SB3939- 15 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1and including the first day of January in the year in which the 2taxes are levied until the taxes are paid or until the property 3is sold under this Code.4    (a) Foreclosure - Property forfeited for 2 or more years. 5A lien may be foreclosed, in the circuit court in the name of 6the People of the State of Illinois, whenever the taxes for 2 7or more years on the same description of property have been 8forfeited to the State. The property may be sold under the 9order of the court by the person having authority to receive 10County taxes, with notice to interested parties and right of 11redemption from the sale, (except that the interest or any 12other amount to be paid upon redemption in addition to the 13amount for which the property was sold shall be as provided 14herein), as provided in Sections 21-345 through 21-365 and 1521-380, and in conformity with Section 8 of Article IX of the 16Illinois Constitution.17    (a-5) Notice of Pending Action for Foreclosure must be 18provided by the county clerk in the county seeking foreclosure 19to the property owner via personal service, delivered orally 20or in writing, and confirmed by affidavit. Prior to the 21commencement of a foreclosure action, county clerks must 22conduct a due diligence search of land, court, and other 23records in order to provide service to as many interested 24parties as practicable. The notice must include: (1) the exact 25amount of unpaid taxes; (2) the name, requirements and 26application process for any existing property tax deferral   SB3939- 16 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1program operated in the jurisdiction; (3) information 2regarding local lawyer referral services, and (4) a statement, 3in English and in any language common to a significant portion 4of the populace of the county in which the property is located, 5in the following form:6    WARNING: THERE ARE UNPAID TAXES AND FEES IN THE AMOUNT OF $ 7ON PROPERTY AT (ADDRESS) WHICH YOU MAY OWN OR HAVE A LEGAL 8INTEREST IN. THE PROPERTY WILL BE DEEDED TO THE COUNTY AND YOUR 9INTEREST WILL BE TERMINATED UNLESS THE BACK TAXES AND FEES ARE 10PAID. TO MAKE PAYMENT, OR TO RECEIVE FURTHER INFORMATION ABOUT 11PAYMENT, CONTACT (COUNTY CLERK) IMMEDIATELY AT (ADDRESS), 12(TELEPHONE NUMBER). IF THE PROPERTY IS DEEDED TO THE COUNTY AS 13A WAY OF COLLECTING THE BACK TAXES AND FEES OWED, AND THE 14PROPERTY IS WORTH MORE THAN YOU OWE, YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A 15RETURN OF MONEY FROM THE COUNTY. IN ORDER TO RECEIVE A NOTICE 16OF A POTENTIAL SURPLUS FROM THE COUNTY, PLEASE PROVIDE THE 17COUNTY WITH NOTICE OF A CURRENT ADDRESS AT THE EMAIL ADDRESS OR 18WEBSITE LISTED HERE:_________, AND UPDATE THAT ADDRESS IF YOU 19MOVE. THERE ARE GOVERNMENT AGENCIES AND NONPROFIT 20ORGANIZATIONS THAT CAN GIVE YOU INFORMATION ABOUT FORECLOSURE 21AND HELP YOU DECIDE WHAT TO DO. FOR GENERAL INFORMATION AT NO 22COST TO YOU, CONTACT A CERTIFIED HOUSING COUNSELOR. YOU MAY 23ALSO WISH TO SEEK LEGAL ADVICE TO DETERMINE YOUR BEST ACTION. 24FREE LEGAL ADVICE IS AVAILABLE AT [WEBSITE].25    (a-10) In any action to foreclose the lien for delinquent 26taxes brought by the People of the State of Illinois when the   SB3939- 17 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1taxes for 2 or more years on the same description of property 2have been forfeited to the State, service of process shall be 3made in the manner now prescribed by law. All owners, parties 4interested, and occupants of any property against which tax 5liens are sought to be foreclosed shall be named as parties 6defendant, and shall be served in the manner and form as 7provided by law for the service of defendants in foreclosures 8of lien or encumbrances upon real estate. In case there are 9other parties with ownership interests in the property, they 10shall be named in the notice under the designation "unknown 11owners".12    (b) Redemption interest. The interest to be paid upon 13redemption from all tax foreclosure sales held under this 14Section shall be: 15        (1) If redeemed within 2 months from the date of the 16    sale, 3% per month upon the amount for which the property 17    was sold for each of the first 2 months, or fraction 18    thereof; 19        (2) If redeemed between 2 and 6 months from the date of 20    the sale, 12% of the amount of sale; 21        (3) If redeemed between 6 and 12 months from the date 22    of the sale, 24% of the amount of sale; 23        (4) If redeemed between 12 and 18 months from the date 24    of the sale, 36% of the amount of sale; 25        (5) If redeemed between 18 and 24 months from the date 26    of the sale, 48% of the amount of sale;   SB3939- 18 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        (6) If redeemed after 24 months from the date of sale, 2    the 48% for the 24 months plus interest at 6% per year 3    thereafter.4    (c) Enforcement of lien from rents and profits. A lien 5under this Section may be enforced at any time after 6 months 6from the day the tax becomes delinquent out of the rents and 7profits of the land accruing, or accrued and under the control 8or jurisdiction of a court. This process may be initiated by 9the county board of the county or by the corporate authorities 10of any taxing body entitled to receive any part of the 11delinquent tax, by petition in any pending suit having 12jurisdiction of the land, or in any application for judgment 13and order of sale of lands for delinquent taxes in which the 14land is included, in the name of the People of the State of 15Illinois.16    The process, practice and procedure under this subsection 17shall be the same as provided in the Civil Practice Law and the 18Supreme Court Rules adopted in relation to that Law, except 19that receivers may be appointed on not less than 3 days' 20written notice to owners of record or persons in possession. 21In all petitions the court shall have power to appoint the 22county collector to take possession of the property only for 23the purpose of collecting the rents, issues and profits 24therefrom, and to apply them in satisfaction of the tax lien. 25When the taxes set forth in the petition are paid in full, the 26receiver shall be discharged. If the taxes described in the   SB3939- 19 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1petition are reduced by the final judgment of a court, the 2county collector shall immediately refund all moneys collected 3by him or her as receiver over and above the taxes as reduced, 4and shall deduct that amount from the moneys thereafter 5distributed to the taxing bodies which received the tax 6revenue. 7    In proceedings to foreclose the tax lien, or in petitions 8to enforce the lien, the amount due on the collector's books 9against the property shall be prima facie evidence of the 10amount of taxes against the property. When any taxes are 11collected, they shall be paid to the county collector, to be 12distributed by him or her to the authorities entitled to them. 13All sales made under this Section shall be conducted under the 14order and supervision of the court by the county collector.15    An action to foreclose the lien for delinquent taxes under 16this Code is an action in rem.17(Source: P.A. 84-551; 88-455.) 18    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)19    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 20proceeds. 21    (a) For tax years before tax year 2027, when When any 22property is offered for sale under any of the provisions of 23this Code, the county board of the county in which the property 24is located, in its discretion, may bid, or, in the case of 25forfeited property, may apply to purchase it or otherwise   SB3939- 20 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1acquire the tax lien or certificate in the name of the county 2as trustee for all taxing districts having an interest in the 3property's taxes or special assessments for the nonpayment of 4which the property is sold. The presiding officer of the 5county board, with the advice and consent of the board, may 6appoint on its behalf some officer, person, or entity to 7attend such sales, bid on tax liens or certificates, and act on 8behalf of the county when exercising its authority under this 9Section. The county shall apply on the bid or purchase the 10unpaid taxes and special assessments due upon the property. No 11cash need be paid.12    (a-5) For tax year 2027 and thereafter, the tax lien or 13certificate for all delinquent property subject to a tax sale 14shall be assigned to the county as trustee for all taxing 15districts having an interest in the property's taxes or 16special assessment for the nonpayment of which the property is 17sold. No cash need be paid.18    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 19an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 20shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 21certificates that are forfeited to the State or county. No 22cash need be paid for the forfeited tax lien or certificate. 23    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 24subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, the county may take 25steps necessary to acquire title to the property and may 26manage and operate the property, including, but not limited   SB3939- 21 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance greenery, removal of 2garbage, waste, debris or other materials, or the demolition, 3repair, or remediation of unsafe structures. When a county, or 4other taxing district within the county, is a petitioner for a 5tax deed, no filing fee shall be required. When a county or 6other taxing district within the county is the petitioner for 7a tax deed, one petition may be filed including all parcels 8that are tax delinquent within the county or taxing district, 9and any publication made under Section 22-20 of this Code may 10combine all such parcels within a single notice. The notice 11may include the street address as listed on the most recent 12available tax bills, if available, and shall list the Property 13Index Number of the parcels for informational purposes. The 14county, as tax creditor and as trustee for other tax 15creditors, or other taxing district within the county, shall 16not be required to allege and prove that all taxes and special 17assessments which become due and payable after the sale or 18forfeiture to the county have been paid nor shall the county be 19required to pay the subsequently accruing taxes or special 20assessments at any time. The county board or its designee may 21prohibit the county collector from including the property in 22the tax sale of one or more subsequent years. The lien of taxes 23and special assessments which become due and payable after a 24sale to a county shall merge in the fee title of the county, or 25other taxing district within the county, on the issuance of a 26deed.  SB3939- 22 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    For tax years before tax year 2027, the The county may sell 2any property acquired with authority provided in this Section, 3or assign any tax certificate to any party, including, but not 4limited to, taxing districts, municipalities, land banks 5created pursuant to Illinois law, or non-profit developers 6focused on constructing affordable housing. For tax year 2027 7and thereafter, the county must attempt to sell the property 8acquired by tax deed under the procedure in Section 21-92. 9    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further 10rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 11reimbursement, if a tax deed has not been recorded within 4 12years after the date of the assignment unless a court extends 13the assignment period as provided in this Section. Upon a 14motion by the assignee, a court may toll the 4-year deadline 15for a specified period of time if the court finds the assignee 16is prevented from obtaining or recording a deed by injunction 17or order of any court, by the refusal or inability of any court 18to act upon the application for a tax deed, by a municipality's 19refusal to issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for 20recording, or by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. 21If an assigned tax certificate is void under this Section, it 22shall be forfeited to the county and held as a valid 23certificate of sale in the county's name pursuant to this 24Section 21-90. The proceeds of any sale or assignment under 25this Section, less all costs of the county incurred in the 26acquisition, operation, maintenance, and sale of the property   SB3939- 23 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1or assignment of the tax certificate, including all costs 2associated with county staff and overhead used to perform the 3duties of the trustee set forth in this Section, shall be 4distributed to the taxing districts in proportion to their 5respective interests therein.6    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 7county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other 8bidders.9(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    (35 ILCS 200/21-92 new)11    Sec. 21-92. Disposition of property acquired by tax deed 12by county as trustee.13    (a) If the county must attempt to sell the property 14acquired by tax deed, the county may employ a licensed realtor 15in order to accomplish the sale and allow the realtor to retain 16a commission of 3.0% of the value of the property. A property 17owner may request that the property be listed with a realtor 18under the same terms. If the county or property owner cannot 19retain a realtor and can verify three attempts to retain a 20realtor or a reasonable time of not less than one year has 21passed and the realtor cannot complete sale of the property, 22the County must sell the property at auction.23    (b) The auction must follow the following procedure:24        (1) the auction must be advertised in a multiple 25    listing service for at least 30 days prior to the date of   SB3939- 24 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    the auction;2        (2) the minimum starting bid must be two-thirds of the 3    property's most recent assessed value as determined by the 4    county assessor;5        (3) a limited auction fee of no more than 3% of the 6    value of the property. The auction may include an online 7    bidding process in which bids are received electronically 8    over the Internet in real time. If the property fails to 9    sell at auction, the county shall conduct a public high 10    bid auction in which the minimum starting bid shall equal 11    the amount of the outstanding taxes and other allowable 12    costs chargeable against the property. If the property 13    fails to sell after the county conducts an auction, the 14    county may forgive the amount of outstanding taxes and 15    allowable costs and retain the property for public 16    purposes or transfer title to a nonprofit organization for 17    purposes of public benefit.18    (c) If the sale or auction of the property results in a 19surplus after consideration of commissions and costs, the 20county must return the surplus to persons with an interest in 21the property. If any person with an interest in the property 22cannot be found, the County must report the surplus to the 23Illinois Treasurer for distribution as unclaimed property 24under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. The report 25shall include the address, phone number and tax ID number of 26the most recent owner or owners together with any other   SB3939- 25 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1information regarding the property owner or owners' identity.2    (d) Determination of surplus.3        (1) As used in this Section, surplus means an amount 4    equal to the value of real property for which a tax deed 5    was issued under this chapter and disposed of by the 6    County as permitted herein less the allowable costs the 7    county may charge against the property under subsection 8    and any realtor commission.9        (2) The amount of a surplus shall be determined within 10    60 days after the date on which the gross sales proceeds 11    from the sale of the property are received by the county.12        (3) For property sold by listing with a real estate 13    broker or agent or sold at auction, the amount of the 14    surplus is the value received by the county minus:15            (i) an amount required to repay any obligations 16        incurred under the Property Tax Program created under 17        Section 7 of the State Deposit of Moneys Act; the 18        Treasurer may adopt rules to further the 19        administration of this Section;20            (ii) costs of sale, including realtor commission 21        and court costs;22            (iii) fees authorized by this Code;23            (iv) an amount required to pay taxes owed to 24        taxing bodies net of any amounts received for this 25        purpose under the Property Tax Program created under 26        Section 7 of the State Deposit of Moneys Act;  SB3939- 26 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1            (v) any liens placed on the property.2            (vi) Within 60 days of the sale, the County shall 3        deliver notice of a surplus to: (a) The claimant at the 4        claimant's last known address. At the top of the 5        notice in capital letters, in at least 14-point type, 6        the following language: NOTICE: YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A 7        REFUND OF MONEY HELD BY THE COUNTY. TO RECEIVE MORE 8        INFORMATION AND ASSISTANCE, CONTACT [insert county 9        office and telephone number and website]. THERE ARE 10        GOVERNMENT AGENCIES AND NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS THAT 11        CAN GIVE YOU INFORMATION ABOUT FORECLOSURE AND HELP 12        YOU DECIDE WHAT TO DO. FOR GENERAL INFORMATION AT NO 13        COST TO YOU, CONTACT A CERTIFIED HOUSING COUNSELOR AT 14        [INSERT LEGAL AID WEBSITE]. IF YOU DO NOT CLAIM THE 15        REFUND BY [INSERT APPROPRIATE TIME FOR REPORT TO 16        UNCLAIMED PROPERTY] YOU MAY CONTACT THE ILLINOIS STATE 17        TREASURER AT [PHONE NUMBER] OR SEEK INFORMATION AT 18        [WEBSITE].19            (vii) The County shall distribute funds received 20        for the sale of the property to the parties entitled to 21        the funds under this Section within 30 days of 22        receipt.23            (viii) after a good faith attempt to sell the 24        property under this Section the county may transfer 25        the deed to any property acquired by tax deed to taxing 26        districts, municipalities, land banks created pursuant   SB3939- 27 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        to Illinois law, or non-profit developers focused on 2        constructing affordable housing. The recipient of the 3        deed shall calculate the value of the property as if it 4        were a taking under domain for purposes of returning 5        any surplus value to persons with an ownership 6        interest.7            (ix) This Section applies only to liens or 8        certificates originally issued in tax years after the 9        effective date of this amendatory act.10    (d) Subsections (a) through (c) of this Section shall only 11apply to tax sales for the tax year occurring prior to the 12effective date of this amendatory Act.13    (e) Beginning in tax year 2027, the lien for taxes shall be 14assigned to the county as trustee pursuant to subsection (a-5) 15of Section 2-90. 16    (35 ILCS 200/21-135)17    Sec. 21-135. Mailed notice of application for judgment and 18sale. Not less than 15 days before the date of application for 19judgment and sale of delinquent properties, the county 20collector shall mail, by registered or certified mail, a 21notice of the forthcoming application for judgment and sale to 22the person shown by the current collector's warrant book to be 23the party in whose name the taxes were last assessed or to the 24current owner of record and, if applicable, to the party 25specified under Section 15-170. The notice shall include the   SB3939- 28 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1intended dates of application for judgment and sale and 2commencement of the sale, and a description of the properties. 3The county collector must present proof of the mailing to the 4court along with the application for judgement.5    In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, a copy 6of this notice shall also be mailed by the county collector by 7registered or certified mail to any lienholder of record who 8annually requests a copy of the notice. The failure of the 9county collector to mail a notice or its non-delivery to the 10lienholder shall not affect the validity of the judgment.11    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, notice 12shall not be mailed to any person when, under Section 14-15, a 13certificate of error has been executed by the county assessor 14or by both the county assessor and board of appeals (until the 15first Monday in December 1998 and the board of review 16beginning the first Monday in December 1998 and thereafter), 17except as provided by court order under Section 21-120.18    For tax years before tax year 2027, the The collector 19shall collect $10 from the proceeds of each sale to cover the 20costs of registered or certified mailing and the costs of 21advertisement and publication. If a taxpayer pays the taxes on 22the property after the notice of the forthcoming application 23for judgment and sale is mailed but before the sale is made, 24then the collector shall collect $10 from the taxpayer to 25cover the costs of registered or certified mailing and the 26costs of advertisement and publication.  SB3939- 29 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    For tax year 2027 and thereafter, the collector shall add 2$10 for the tax certificate to cover the costs of registered or 3certified mailing and the costs of advertising and 4publication. If a taxpayer pays the taxes on the property 5after the notice of the forthcoming application for judgment 6and sale is mailed but before the tax certificate is issued, 7then the collector shall collect $10 from the taxpayer to 8cover the costs of registered or certified mailing and the 9costs of advertisement and publication. Otherwise, the fee 10shall be collected when the property is redeemed or collected 11from the proceeds of the sale of the property. 12(Source: P.A. 93-899, eff. 8-10-04.) 13    (35 ILCS 200/21-200)14    Sec. 21-200. County clerk assistance at sale. The county 15clerk, in person or by deputy, shall attend all sales for 16taxes, made by the collector, and shall assist at the sales. 17This Section applies only to tax sales that occurred before 18the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19Assembly. 20(Source: Laws 1939, p. 886; P.A. 88-455.) 21    (35 ILCS 200/21-210)22    Sec. 21-210. Bids by taxing districts. Any city, 23incorporated town or village, corporate authorities, 24commissioners, or persons interested in any special assessment   SB3939- 30 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1or installment thereof, may become purchaser at any sale, and 2may designate and appoint some officer or person to attend and 3bid at the sale on its behalf. This Section shall only apply to 4tax sales occurring before the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 6(Source: Laws 1939, p. 886; P.A. 88-455.) 7    (35 ILCS 200/21-215)8    Sec. 21-215. Penalty bids. The person at the sale offering 9to pay the amount due on each property for the least penalty 10percentage shall be the purchaser of that property. No bid 11shall be accepted for a penalty exceeding 9% of the amount of 12the tax or special assessment on property. This subsection 13shall apply only to tax sales occurring before the effective 14date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.15(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    (35 ILCS 200/21-220)17    Sec. 21-220. Letter of credit or bond in counties of 183,000,000 or more; registration in other counties. 19    (a) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, no 20person shall make an offer to pay the amount due on any 21property and the collector shall not accept or acknowledge an 22offer from any person who has not deposited with the 23collector, not less than 10 days prior to making such offer, an 24irrevocable and unconditional letter of credit or such other   SB3939- 31 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1unconditional bond payable to the order of the collector in an 2amount not less than 1.5 times the amount of any tax or special 3assessment due upon the property, provided that in no event 4shall the irrevocable and unconditional letter of credit or 5such other unconditional bond be in an amount less than 6$1,000. The collector may without notice draw upon the letter 7of credit or bond in the event payment of the amount due 8together with interest and costs thereon is not made forthwith 9by the person purchasing any property. At all times during the 10sale, any person making an offer or offers to pay the amount or 11amounts due on any properties shall maintain the letter of 12credit or bond with the collector in an amount not less than 131.5 times the amount due on the properties which he or she has 14purchased and for which he or she has not paid.15    In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, unless 16the county board provides otherwise, no person shall be 17eligible to bid who did not register with the county collector 18at least 10 business days prior to the first day of sale 19authorized under Section 21-115. The registration must be 20accompanied by a deposit in an amount determined by the county 21collector, but not to exceed $250 in counties of less than 2250,000 inhabitants or $500 in all other counties, which must 23be applied to the amount due on the properties that the 24registrant has purchased. If the registrant cannot participate 25in the tax sale, then he or she may notify the tax collector, 26no later than 5 business days prior to the sale, of the name of   SB3939- 32 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1the substitute person who will participate in the sale in the 2registrant's place, and an additional deposit is not required 3for any such substitute person. If the registrant does not 4attend the sale, then the deposit is forfeited to the Tax Sale 5Automation Fund established under Section 21-245. If the 6registrant does attend the sale and attempts, but fails, to 7purchase any parcels offered for sale, then the deposit must 8be refunded to the registrant. 9    This Section applies only to tax sales occurring before 10the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly. 12(Source: P.A. 95-537, eff. 8-28-07.) 13    (35 ILCS 200/21-225)14    Sec. 21-225. Forfeited tax liens and certificates. Every 15tax lien or certificate for property offered at public sale, 16and not sold for want of bidders, unless it is released from 17sale by the withdrawal from collection of a special assessment 18levied thereon, shall be forfeited to the county, as trustee 19for the taxing districts, and managed pursuant to Section 2021-90. Tax certificates are also forfeited to the county in 21those circumstances described in subsection (d) of Section 2221-310 and subsection (f) of Section 22-40 of this Code.23    For tax sales occurring after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, every tax lien 25or certificate shall be assigned to the county as if   SB3939- 33 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1forfeited. 2(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (35 ILCS 200/21-240)4    Sec. 21-240. Payment for property purchased at tax sale; 5reoffering for sale. 6    (a) Except as otherwise provided below, the person 7purchasing any property, or any part thereof, shall be liable 8to the county for the amount due and shall forthwith pay to the 9county collector the amount charged on the property. Upon 10failure to do so, the amount due shall be recoverable in a 11civil action brought in the name of the People of the State of 12Illinois in any court of competent jurisdiction. The person so 13purchasing shall be relieved of liability only by payment of 14the amount due together with interest and costs thereon, or if 15the property is reoffered at the sale, purchased and paid for. 16Reoffering of the property for sale shall be at the discretion 17of the collector. The sale shall not be closed until payment is 18made or the property again offered for sale. In counties with 193,000,000 or more inhabitants, only the taxes, special 20assessments, interest and costs as advertised in the sale 21shall be required to be paid forthwith. Except if the 22purchaser is the county as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90, 23the general taxes charged on the land remaining due and 24unpaid, including amounts subject to certificates of error, 25not included in the advertisement, shall be paid by the   SB3939- 34 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1purchaser within 10 days after the sale, except that upon 2payment of the fee provided by law to the County Clerk (which 3fee shall be deemed part of the costs of sale) the purchaser 4may make written application, within the 10 day period, to the 5county clerk for a statement of all taxes, interest and costs 6due and an estimate of the cost of redemption of all forfeited 7general taxes, which were not included in the advertisement. 8After obtaining such statement and estimate and an order on 9the county collector to receive the amount of forfeited 10general taxes, if any, the purchaser shall pay to the county 11collector all the remaining taxes, interest and costs, and the 12amount necessary to redeem the forfeited general taxes. The 13county collector shall issue the purchaser a receipt therefor. 14Any delay in providing the statement or in accepting payment, 15and delivering receipt therefor, shall not be counted as a 16part of the 10 days. When the receipt of the collector is 17issued, a copy shall be filed with the county clerk and the 18county clerk shall include the amount shown in such receipt in 19the amount of the purchase price of the property in the 20certificate of purchase. The purchaser then shall be entitled 21to a certificate of purchase. If a purchaser fails to complete 22his or her purchase as provided in this Section, the purchase 23shall become void, and be of no effect, but the collector shall 24not refund the amount paid in cash at the time of the sale, 25except in cases of sale in error under subsection (a) of 26Section 21-310. That amount shall be treated as a payment and   SB3939- 35 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1distributed to the taxing bodies as other collections are 2distributed. The lien for taxes for the amount paid shall 3remain on the property, in favor of the purchaser, his or her 4heirs or assigns, until paid with 5% interest per year on that 5amount from the date the purchaser paid it. The amount and fact 6of such ineffective purchase shall be entered in the tax 7judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture record opposite the 8property upon which the lien remains. No redemption shall be 9made without payment of this amount for the benefit of the 10purchaser, and no future sale of the property shall be made 11except subject to the lien of such purchaser. This section 12shall not apply to any purchase by any city, village or 13incorporated town in default of other bidders at any sale for 14delinquent special assessments.15    (b) Subsection (a) applies only to tax sales occurring 16before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 17General Assembly. 18(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/21-245)20    Sec. 21-245. Automation fee. For tax years before tax year 212027, in In all counties, each person purchasing any property 22at a sale under this Code shall pay to the county collector, 23prior to the issuance of any tax certificate, an automation 24fee set by the county collector of not more than $10 for each 25item purchased. A like sum shall be paid for each year that all   SB3939- 36 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1or a portion of the subsequent taxes are paid by a tax 2purchaser and posted to the tax judgment, sale, redemption and 3forfeiture record where the underlying certificate is 4recorded. In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants:5        (a) The fee shall be paid at the time of the purchase 6    if the record keeping system used for processing the 7    delinquent property tax sales is automated or has been 8    approved for automation by the county board. The fee shall 9    be collected in the same manner as other fees or costs.10        (b) Fees collected under this Section shall be 11    retained by the county treasurer in a fund designated as 12    the Tax Sale Automation Fund. The fund shall be audited by 13    the county auditor. The county board, with the approval of 14    the county treasurer, shall make expenditures from the 15    fund (1) to pay any costs related to the automation of 16    property tax collections and delinquent property tax 17    sales, including the cost of hardware, software, research 18    and development, and personnel and (2) to defray the cost 19    of providing electronic access to property tax collection 20    records and delinquent tax sale records.21    For liens or certificates assigned to the county as 22trustee for all taxing districts after the effective date of 23this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a $10 24automation fee set by the county collector shall be added to 25each certificate. A $10 automation fee shall be added for each 26year that all or a portion of subsequent taxes are not paid   SB3939- 37 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1within 90 days of the second installment deadline. The fee 2shall be retained by the county collector in a fund designated 3as the Tax Sale Automation Fund. The fee shall be transferred 4from the proceeds of a redemption or from the sale of the 5foreclosed property. The fund shall be audited by the county 6auditor. The county board, with the approval of the county 7treasurer, shall make expenditures from the fund (1) to pay 8any costs related to the automation of property tax 9collections, including the cost of hardware, software, 10research and development, and personnel and (2) to defray the 11cost of providing electronic access to property tax collection 12records and delinquent tax sale records. 13(Source: P.A. 100-1070, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 14    (35 ILCS 200/21-251)15    Sec. 21-251. Registry of owners of certificates of 16purchase. 17    (a) The county clerk of each county shall create and 18maintain a registry system that permanently records the names, 19addresses, and telephone numbers of owners or assignees of 20certificates of purchase issued pursuant to any tax sale 21conducted under this Code. The registry may consist of a 22single record or a combination of records maintained in paper 23or electronic form and may include copies of records kept by 24the county treasurer for other purposes, all to be used as the 25county clerk deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of   SB3939- 38 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1this Section. The information in the registry shall be made 2available to the public.3    (b) The county clerk of each county is authorized to 4promulgate reasonable rules, procedures, and forms for 5purposes of creating and maintaining the registry and for 6access to the registry information by members of the public. 7In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, any owner of a 8certificate of purchase pursuant to assignment may elect 9whether to register that assignment as provided in this 10Section, but all owners of certificates of purchase shall be 11subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this Section. 12In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the county 13clerk shall provide by rule whether registration of 14assignments of certificates of purchase shall be elective or 15mandatory.16    (c) The owner of a certificate of purchase pursuant to 17assignment, in order to register that assignment, shall submit 18to the county clerk the owner's name, address, and telephone 19number in accordance with any rules, procedures, and forms 20promulgated by the clerk. Any registered owner of a 21certificate of purchase may update the registration at any 22time without charge by submitting to the county clerk any 23lawful change of name, address, or telephone number.24    (d) If notice is required to be given to the owner of the 25certificate of purchase in any proceeding, whether judicial or 26administrative, affecting a tax sale conducted under any   SB3939- 39 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1provision of this Code, the notice may be directed to the most 2recent owner of the certificate of purchase appearing in the 3county clerk's registry under this Section. Any notice that 4has been directed as provided in this Section shall be 5conclusively presumed to be properly directed to the owner of 6the certificate of purchase for all purposes related to the 7proceeding in which the notice is given. No objection or 8assertion by any assignee of a certificate of purchase in any 9proceeding shall be heard on grounds that a notice to the tax 10purchaser was misdirected, unless that assignee's current and 11lawful name, address, and telephone number were submitted to 12the county clerk's registry at the time of the notice in 13question.14    (e) For tax years before tax year 2027, the The county 15clerk may assess an automation fee of no more than $10 to be 16paid by the owner of the certificate of purchase for each 17assignment of the certificate that is registered under this 18Section. The fee shall be collected in the same manner as other 19fees and costs and shall be held by the county clerk in a fund 20for purposes of automating his or her office. The fee provided 21for under this Section shall not be chargeable to the cost of 22redemption under Section 21-355 nor shall it be posted under 23Section 21-360 of this Code.24(Source: P.A. 92-729, eff. 7-25-02.) 25    (35 ILCS 200/21-342 new)  SB3939- 40 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    Sec. 21-342. Repealer. This Division 6 shall only apply to 2liens sold at tax sales for tax years before tax year 2027. 3    (35 ILCS 200/21-398 new)4    Sec. 21-398. Distribution of funds received for 5redemption. For tax years after 2027, funds received to redeem 6property shall be disbursed in the following priority:7        (1) To repay any obligations incurred under the 8    Property Tax Program created under Section 7 of the State 9    Deposit of Moneys Act. The Treasurer may propound rules to 10    further the administration of this Section.11        (2) To transfer any fees added to the tax certificate 12    that are authorized by the Property Tax Code.13        (3) Any remaining funds are to be distributed to the 14    taxing bodies as determined by the original tax bill. 15    Section 15. The Counties Code is amended by changing 16Section 4-4001 as follows: 17    (55 ILCS 5/4-4001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-4001)18    Sec. 4-4001. County clerks; counties of first and second 19class. The fees of the county clerk in counties of the first 20and second class, except when increased by county ordinance 21pursuant to the provisions of this Section, shall be:22        For each official copy of any process, file, record or 23    other instrument of and pertaining to his office, 50¢ for   SB3939- 41 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    each 100 words, and $1 additional for certifying and 2    sealing the same.3        For filing any paper not herein otherwise provided 4    for, $1, except that no fee shall be charged for filing a 5    Statement of economic interest pursuant to the Illinois 6    Governmental Ethics Act or reports made pursuant to 7    Article 9 of the Election Code.8        For issuance of fireworks permits, $2.9        For issuance of liquor licenses, $5.10        For filing and recording of the appointment and oath 11    of each public official, $3.12        For officially certifying and sealing each copy of any 13    process, file, record or other instrument of and 14    pertaining to his office, $1.15        For swearing any person to an affidavit, $1.16        For issuing each license in all matters except where 17    the fee for the issuance thereof is otherwise fixed, $4.18        For issuing each civil union or marriage license, the 19    certificate thereof, and for recording the same, including 20    the recording of the parent's or guardian's consent where 21    indicated, a fee to be determined by the county board of 22    the county, not to exceed $75, which shall be the same, 23    whether for a civil union or marriage license. $5 from all 24    civil union and marriage license fees shall be remitted by 25    the clerk to the State Treasurer for deposit into the 26    Domestic Violence Fund.   SB3939- 42 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        For taking and certifying acknowledgments to any 2    instrument, except where herein otherwise provided for, 3    $1.4        For issuing each certificate of appointment or 5    commission, the fee for which is not otherwise fixed by 6    law, $1.7        For cancelling tax sale and issuing and sealing 8    certificates of redemption, $3.9        For issuing order to county treasurer for redemption 10    of forfeited tax, $2.11        For trying and sealing weights and measures by county 12    standard, together with all actual expenses in connection 13    therewith, $1.14        For services in case of estrays, $2.15        The following fees shall be allowed for services 16    attending the sale of land for taxes, and shall be charged 17    as costs against the delinquent property and be collected 18    with the taxes thereon:19        For services in attending the tax sale and issuing 20    certificate of sale and sealing the same, for each tract 21    or town lot sold, $4. For tax years after tax year 2027, 22    the fee shall be added to the tax certificate and shall be 23    paid when the property is redeemed or from the proceeds of 24    the sale of property. 25        For making list of delinquent lands and town lots 26    sold, to be filed with the Comptroller, for each tract or   SB3939- 43 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    town lot sold, 10¢.2    The county board of any county of the first or second class 3may by ordinance authorize the county clerk to impose an 4additional $2 charge for certified copies of vital records as 5defined in Section 1 of the Vital Records Act, for the purpose 6of developing, maintaining, and improving technology in the 7office of the County Clerk. 8    The foregoing fees allowed by this Section are the maximum 9fees that may be collected from any officer, agency, 10department or other instrumentality of the State. The county 11board may, however, by ordinance, increase the fees allowed by 12this Section and the indexing and filing of assumed name 13certificate fees allowed by Section 3 of the Assumed Business 14Name Act and collect such increased fees from all persons and 15entities other than officers, agencies, departments and other 16instrumentalities of the State if the increase is justified by 17an acceptable cost study showing that the fees allowed by 18these Sections are not sufficient to cover the cost of 19providing the service.20    A Statement of the costs of providing each service, 21program and activity shall be prepared by the county board. 22All supporting documents shall be public record and subject to 23public examination and audit. All direct and indirect costs, 24as defined in the United States Office of Management and 25Budget Circular A-87, may be included in the determination of 26the costs of each service, program and activity.  SB3939- 44 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    The county clerk in all cases may demand and receive the 2payment of all fees for services in advance so far as the same 3can be ascertained.4    The county board of any county of the first or second class 5may by ordinance authorize the county treasurer to establish a 6special fund for deposit of the additional charge. Moneys in 7the special fund shall be used solely to provide the 8equipment, material and necessary expenses incurred to help 9defray the cost of implementing and maintaining such document 10storage system.11(Source: P.A. 102-160, eff. 6-5-23 (See Section 91 of P.A. 12103-562 for effective date of P.A. 102-160).) 13    Section 20. The Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act is 14amended by adding Sections 15-407, 15-505, and 15-706 as 15follows: 16    (765 ILCS 1026/15-407 new)17    Sec. 15-407. Reports. Reports from local governments due 18to tax surplusage will be treated as reports from holders for 19purposes of this Act. 20    (765 ILCS 1026/15-505 new)21    Sec. 15-505. Local governments. Property reported to the 22administrator from local governments will be treated as 23presumably abandoned for purposes of this Act.   SB3939- 45 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    (765 ILCS 1026/15-705)2    Sec. 15-705. Exceptions to the sale of tangible property. 3The administrator shall dispose of tangible property 4identified by this Section in accordance with this Section.5    (a) Military medals or decorations. The administrator may 6not sell a medal or decoration awarded for military service in 7the armed forces of the United States. Instead, the 8administrator, with the consent of the respective organization 9under paragraph (1), agency under paragraph (2), or entity 10under paragraph (3), may deliver a medal or decoration to be 11held in custody for the owner, to:12        (1) a military veterans organization qualified under 13    Section 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code;14        (2) the agency that awarded the medal or decoration; 15    or16        (3) a governmental entity.17    After delivery, the administrator is not responsible for 18the safekeeping of the medal or decoration.19    (b) Property with historical value. Property that the 20administrator reasonably believes may have historical value 21may be, at his or her discretion, loaned to an accredited 22museum in the United States where it will be kept until such 23time as the administrator orders it to be returned to his or 24her custody.25    (c) Human remains. If human remains are delivered to the   SB3939- 46 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1administrator under this Act, the administrator shall deliver 2those human remains to the coroner of the county in which the 3human remains were abandoned for disposition under Section 43-3034 of the Counties Code. The only human remains that may be 5delivered to the administrator under this Act and that the 6administrator may receive are those that are reported and 7delivered as contents of a safe deposit box.8    (d) Evidence in a criminal investigation. Property that 9may have been used in the commission of a crime or that may 10assist in the investigation of a crime, as determined after 11consulting with the Illinois State Police, shall be delivered 12to the Illinois State Police or other appropriate law 13enforcement authority to allow law enforcement to determine 14whether a criminal investigation should take place. Any such 15property delivered to a law enforcement authority shall be 16held in accordance with existing statutes and rules related to 17the gathering, retention, and release of evidence.18    (e) Firearms.19        (1) The administrator, in cooperation with the 20    Illinois State Police, shall develop a procedure to 21    determine whether a firearm delivered to the administrator 22    under this Act has been stolen or used in the commission of 23    a crime. The Illinois State Police shall determine the 24    appropriate disposition of a firearm that has been stolen 25    or used in the commission of a crime. The administrator 26    shall attempt to return a firearm that has not been stolen   SB3939- 47 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1    or used in the commission of a crime to the rightful owner 2    if the Illinois State Police determines that the owner may 3    lawfully possess the firearm.4        (2) If the administrator is unable to return a firearm 5    to its owner, the administrator shall transfer custody of 6    the firearm to the Illinois State Police. Legal title to a 7    firearm transferred to the Illinois State Police under 8    this subsection (e) is vested in the Illinois State Police 9    by operation of law if:10            (i) the administrator cannot locate the owner of 11        the firearm;12            (ii) the owner of the firearm may not lawfully 13        possess the firearm;14            (iii) the apparent owner does not respond to 15        notice published under Section 15-503 of this Act; or16            (iv) the apparent owner responds to notice 17        published under Section 15-502 and states that he or 18        she no longer claims an interest in the firearm.19        (3) With respect to a firearm whose title is 20    transferred to the Illinois State Police under this 21    subsection (e), the Illinois State Police may:22            (i) retain the firearm for use by the crime 23        laboratory system, for training purposes, or for any 24        other application as deemed appropriate by the 25        Department;26            (ii) transfer the firearm to the Illinois State   SB3939- 48 -LRB104 17733 HLH 31164 b1        Museum if the firearm has historical value; or2            (iii) destroy the firearm if it is not retained 3        pursuant to subparagraph (i) or transferred pursuant 4        to subparagraph (ii).5    As used in this subsection, "firearm" has the meaning 6provided in the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.7    (f) The sale of real properties foreclosed upon for 8delinquent taxes under the Property Tax Code are not subject 9to Section 15-702 of this Act and must be sold by the County 10under the provisions of the Property Tax Code.11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)